Fabaceous
Faba'ceous. adj. [fabaceus, Latin.] Having the nature of a bean. Dict.

Fable (noun)
Fa'ble. n.s. [fable, French; fabula, Latin.]

 A feigned story intended to enforce some moral precept.
Jotham's fable of the bees is the oldest extant, and as beautiful as any made since. Addison's Spectator.
 A fiction in general.
Triptolemus, so sung the nine,Strew'd plenty from his cart divine;But, spite of all those fable makers,He never sow'd on Almaign acres. Dryden.
 A vitious or foolish fiction.
But refuse profane and old wives fables. 1 Tim. iv. 7.
 The series or contexture of events which constitute a poem epick or dramatick.
The moral is the first business of the poet: this being formed, he contrives such a design or fable as may be most suitable to the moral. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
The first thing to be considered in an epick poem is the fable, which is perfect or imperfect, according as the action, which it relates, is more or less so. Addison's Spectator.
 A lye. This sense is merely familiar.

Fable (verb active)
To Fa'ble. v.a. To feign; to tell of falsety.
                      We mean to win,Or turn this heav'n itself into the hellThou fablest. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vi. l. 292.
    Ladies of th' Hesperides, that seem'dFairer than feign'd of old, or fabl'd sinceOf fair damsels met in forest wide,By knights. Milton's Parad. Lost.

Fable (verb neuter)
To Fa'ble. v.n. [from the noun.]

 To feign; to write not truth but fiction.
That Saturn's sons receiv'd the three-fold reignOf heav'n, of ocean, and deep hell beneath,Old poets mention, fabling. Prior.
Vain now the tales which fabling poets tell,That wav'ring conquest still desires to rove!In Marlbro's camp the goddess knows to dwell. Prior.
 To tell falsehoods; to lye.
He fables not: I hear the enemy. Shakesp. Henry VI.

Fabled
Fa'bled. adj. [from fable.] Celebrated in fables.
Hail, fabled grotto! hail, Elysian soil!Thou fairest spot of fair Britannia's isle! Tickell.

Fabler
Fa'bler. n.s. [from fable.] A dealer in fiction; a writer of feigned stories.

Fabricate
To Fa'bricate. v.a. [fabricor, Latin.]

 To build; to construct.

 To forge; to devise falsely. This sense is retained among the Scottish lawyers; for when they suspect a paper to be forged, they say it is fabricate.

Fabrication
Fabrica'tion n.s. [from fabricate.] The act of building; construction.
This fabrication of the human body is the immediate work of a vital principle, that formeth the first rudiments of the human nature. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Fabrick (noun)
Fa'brick. n.s. [fabrica, Latin.]

 A building; an edifice.
There must be an exquisite care to place the columns, set in several stories, most precisely one over another, that so the solid may answer to the solid, and the vacuities to the vacuities, as well for beauty as strength of the fabrick. Wotton.
 Any system or compages of matter; any body formed by the conjunction of dissimilar parts.
                Still will ye think it strange,That all the parts of this great fabrick change;Quit their old station and primeval frame. Prior.

Fabrick (verb)
To Fa'brick. v.a. [from the noun.] To build; to form; to construct.
                Shew what laws of lifeThe cheese inhabitants observe, and howFabrick their mansions. Philips.

Fabulist
Fa'bulist. n.s. [fabuliste, French.] A writer of fables.
Quitting Esop and the fabulists, he copies from Boccace. Croxal.
Our bard's a fabulist, and deals in fiction. Garrick.

Fabulosity
Fabulo'sity. n.s. [fabulositas, Latin.] Lyingness; fulness of stories; fabulous invention.
In their fabulosity they would report, that they had observations for twenty thousand years. Abbot's Description of the World.

Fabulous
Fa'bulous. adj. [fabulosus, Latin.] Feigned; full of fables, or invented tales.
A person terrified with the imagination of spectres, is more reasonable than one who thinks the appearance of spirits fabulous and groundless. Addison's Spectator, № 110.

Fabulously
Fa'bulously. adv. [from fabulous.] In fiction; in a fabulous manner.
There are many things fabulously delivered, and are not to be accepted as truths. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 8.

Face (noun)
Face. n.s. [face, French, from facies, Latin.]

 The visage.
The children of Israel saw the face of Moses, that the skin of Moses's face shone. Exod. xxxiv. 35.
A man shall see faces, which, if you examine them part by part, you shall never find good; but take them together, are not uncomely. Bacon, Essay 44.
From beauty still to beauty ranging,In ev'ry face I found a dart. Addison's Spectator.
 Countenance; cast of the features; look; air of the face.
Seiz'd and ty'd down to judge, how wretched I!Who can't be silent, and who will not lye:To laugh, were want of goodness and of grace;And to be grave, exceeds all pow'r of face. Pope's Epistles.
 The surface of any thing.
A mist watered the whole face of the ground. Gen. ii. 6.
 The front or forepart of any thing.
The breadth of the face of the house, towards the East, was an hundred cubits. Ezek. xli. 14.
 State of affairs.
He look'd, and saw the face of things quite chang'd,The brazen throat of war had ceas'd to roar;All now was turn'd to jollity and game,To luxury and riot, feast and dances. Milton's Par. Lost.
This would produce a new face of things in Europe. Addis.
 Appearance; resemblance.
Keep still your former face, and mix againWith these lost spirits; run all their mazes with 'em;For such are treasons. Ben. Johnson.
At the first shock, with blood and powder stain'd,Nor heav'n, nor sea, their former face retain'd;Fury and art produce effects so strange,They trouble nature, and her visage change. Waller.
His dialogue has so much the face of probability, that some have mistaken it for a real conference. Baker.
 Presence; sight.
Ye shall give her unto Eleazar, and one shall slay her before his face. Numb. xix. 3.
Jove cannot fear; then tell me to my face,That I of all the gods am least in grace. Dryden's Iliad.
 Confidence; boldness.
                Thinking, by this face,To fasten in our thoughts that they have courage;But 'tis not so. Shakespeare's Julius Cæsar.
How many things are there which a man cannot, with any face or comliness, say or do himself? A man can scarce allege his own merits with modesty, much less extol them: a man cannot sometimes brook to supplicate or beg. Bacon, Essay 28.
You'll find the thing will not be doneWith ignorance and face alone. Hudibras, p. ii.
You, says the judge to the wolf, have the face to challenge that which you never lost; and you, says he to the fox, have the confidence to deny that which you have certainly stolen. L'Estrange, Fable 415.
This is the man that has the face to charge others with false citations. Tillotson, Preface.
 Distortion of the face.
                                Shame itself!Why do you make such faces? Shakespeare's Macbeth.

Face (verb active)
To Face. v.a.

 To meet in front; to oppose with confidence and firmness.
                        I'll faceThis tempest, and deserve the name of king. Dryden.
We get intelligence of the force of the enemy, and cast about for a sufficient number of troops to face the enemy in the field of battle. Addison on War.
They are as loth to see the fires kindled in Smithfield as his lordship; and, at least, as ready to face them under a popish persecution. Swift.
 To oppose with impudence.
We trapann'd the state, and fac'd it downWith plots and projects of our own. Hudibras, p. iii. c. 2.
Because he walk'd against his will,He fac'd men down that he stood still. Prior.
 To stand opposite to.
On one side is the head of the emperor Trajan; the reverse has on it the circus Maximus, and a view of the side of the Palatine mountain that faces it. Addison on Italy.
The temple is described to be square, and the four fronts with open gates, facing the different quarters of the world. Pope's Temple of Fame.
 To cover with an additional superficies; to invest with a covering.
The whole fortification of Soleurre is faced with marble. Addison's Remarks on Italy.
Where your old bank is hollow, face it with the first spit of earth that you dig out of the ditch. Mortimer's Husbandry.

Face (verb neuter)
To Face. v.n. [from the noun.]

 To carry a false appearance; to play the hypocrite.
        Thou needs must learn to laugh, to lye,To face, to forge, to scoff, to company. Hubberd's Tale.
 To turn the face; to come in front.
Face about, man; you a soldier, and afraid of the enemy! Dryden's Spanish Fryar.
Then thrice the mounted squadrons ride aroundThe fire, and Arcite's name they thrice resound;Hail and farewel they shouted thrice amain,Thrice facing to the left, and thence they turn'd again. Dry.

Face to Face
Face to Face. [An adverbial expression.]

 When both parties are present.
It is not the manner of the Romans to deliver any man to die, before that he which is accused have his accusers face to face. Acts xxv. 16.
 Nakedly; without the interposition of other bodies.
Now we see through a glass darkly; but then face to face. 1 Cor. xiii. 12.

Faceless
Fa'celess. adj. [from face.] Without a face. Bailey.

Facepainter
Facepai'nter. n.s. [face and painter.] A drawer of portraits; a painter who draws from the life.

Facepainting
Facepai'nting. n.s. [face and painting.] The art of drawing portraits.
Georgione, the contemporary of Titian, excelled in portraits or facepainting. Dryden's Dufresnoy.

Facet
Fa'cet. n.s. [facette, French.] A small surface; a superficies cut into several angles.
Honour that is gained and broken upon another, hath the quickest reflection, like diamonds cut with facets. Bacon.

Facetious
Face'tious. adj. [facetieux, French; facetiæ, Lat.] Gay; cheerful; lively; merry; witty. It is used both of persons and sentiments.
Socrates, informed of some derogating speeches used of him behind his back, made this facetious reply, Let him beat me too when I am absent. Government of the Tongue, s. 6.

Facetiously
Face'tiously. adv. [from facetious.] Gayly; cheerfully; wittily; merrily.

Facetiousness
Face'tiousness. n.s. [from facetious.] Cheerful wit; mirth; gaiety.

Facile
Fa'cile. adj. [facile, French; facilis, Latin.]

 Easy; not difficult; performable or attainable with little labour.
Then also those poets, which are now counted most hard, will be both facile and pleasant. Milton on Education.
To confine the imagination is as facile a performance as the Goteham's design of hedging in the cuckoo. Glanv. Sceps.
By dividing it into parts so distinct, the order in which they shall find each disposed, will render the work facile and delightful. Evelyn's Kalendar.
This may at first seem perplexed with many difficulties, yet many things may be suggested to make it more facile and commodious. Wilkin's Math. Magic.
 Easily surmountable; easily conquerable.
The facile gates of hell too slightly barr'd. Milt. P. Lost.
 Easy of access or converse; not haughty; not supercilious; not austere.
I meant she should be courteous, facile, sweet,Hating that solemn vice of greatness, pride;I meant each softest virtue there should meet,Fit in that softer bosom to reside. Ben. Johnson's Epigrams.
Raphael now, to Adam's doubt propos'd,Benevolent and facile, thus reply'd. Milton's Paradise Lost.
 Pliant; flexible; easily persuaded to good or bad; ductile to a fault.
Too facile then, thou did'st not much gainsay;Nay did'st permit, approve, and fair dismiss. Milt. P. Lost.
Since Adam and his facile consort EveLost Paradise, deceiv'd by me. Milton's Paradise Regain'd.
Some men are of that facile temper, that they are wrought upon by every object they converse with, whom any affectionate discourse, or serious sermon, or any notable accident, shall put into a fit of religion, which yet usually lasts no longer than till somewhat else comes in their way. Calamy.

Facilitate
Faci'litate. v.a. [faciliter, French.] To make easy; to free from difficulty; to clear from impediments.
Choice of the likeliest and best prepared metal for the version will facilitate the work. Bacon's Natural History.
They renewed their assault two or three days together, and planted cannon to facilitate their passage, which did little hurt; but they still lost many men in the attempt. Clarendon, b. viii.
Though perspective cannot be called a certain rule, or a finishing of the picture, yet it is a great succour and relief to art, and facilitates the means of execution. Dryden's Dufresn.
What produceth a due quantity of animal spirits, necessarily facilitates the animal and natural motions. Arbuthnot on Diet.
A war on the side of Italy would cause a great diversion of the French forces, and facilitate the progress of our arms in Spain. Swift.

Facility
Faci'lity. n.s. [facilitè, French; facilitas, Latin.]

 Easiness to be performed; freedom from difficulty.
Yet reason saith, reason should have abilityTo hold these worldly things in such proportion,As let them come or go with even facility. Sidney, b. ii.
Piety could not be diverted from this to a more commodious business by any motives of profit or facility. Raleigh.
A war upon the Turks is more worthy than upon any other Gentiles, both in point of religion and in point of honour; though facility and hope of success might invite some other choice. Bacon's Holy War.
 Readiness in performing; dexterity.
They who have studied have not only learned many excellent things, but also have acquired a great facility of profiting themselves by reading good authors. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
The facility which we get of doing things, by a custom of doing, makes them often pass in us without our notice. Locke.
 Vitious ductility; easiness to be persuaded to good or bad; to ready compliance.
Facility is worse than bribery; for bribes come now and then: but if importunity or idle respects lead a man, he shall never be without. Bacon, Essay 11.
'Tis a great error to take facility for good-nature; tenderness, without distinction, is no better than a more pardonable folly. L'Estrange, Fable 30.
 Easiness of access; complaisance; condescension; affability.
He opens and yields himself to the man of business with difficulty and reluctancy; but offers himself to the visits of a friend with facility, and all the meeting readiness of appetite and desire. South's Sermons.

Facinerious
Facine'rious. adj. [corrupted by Shakespeare from facinorous; facinus, facinoris, Latin.] Wicked; facinorous.
'Tis strange, 'tis very strange, that is the brief and the tedious of it; and he's of a most facinerious spirit that will not acknowledge it. Shakes. All's well that ends well.

Facing
Fa'cing. n.s. [from To face.] An ornamental covering; that which is put on the outside of any thing by way of decoration.
These offices and dignities were but the facings and fringes of his greatness. Wotton.

Facinorous
Faci'norous. adj. [facinora, Latin.] Wicked; atrocious; detestably bad.

Facinorousness
Faci'norousness. n.s. [from facinorous.] Wickedness in a high degree.

Fact
Fact. n.s. [factum, Latin.]

 A thing done; an effect produced; something not barely supposed or suspected, but really done.
 In matter of fact there is some credit to be given to the testimony of man; but not in matter of opinion and judgment: we see the contrary both acknowledged and universally practised also throughout the world. Hooker, b. ii. s. 7.
 As men are not to mistake the causes of these operations, so much less are they to mistake the fact or effect, and rashly to take that for done which is not done. Bacon's Nat. History.
 Matter of fact breaks out and blazes with too great an evidence to be denied. South's Sermons.
 Reality; not supposition; not speculation.
 Those effects which are wrought by the percussion of the sense, and by things in fact, are produced likewise in some degree by the imagination: therefore if a man see another eat sour or acid things, which set the teeth on edge, that object tainteth the imagination. Bacon's Natural History, № 795.
 If this were true in fact, I do not see any colour for such a conclusion. Addison on the State of the War.
 Manifold sins, though in speculation they may be separable from war, in reality and fact never fail to attend it. Smalridge.
 Action; deed.


 Unhappy man! to break the pious laws Of nature, pleading in his children's cause:


Howe'er doubtful fact is understood, 'Tis love of honour and his country's good; The consul, not the father, sheds the blood.

  Dryden.

Faction
Fa'ction. n.s. [faction, French; factio, Latin.]

 A party in a state.
 The queen is valued thirty thousand strong; If she hath time to breathe, be well assur'd Her faction will be full as strong as ours. Shakes. Henry VI.
 He has been known to commit outrages, And cherish factions. Shakespeare's Timon.
 Their hatred went so far, that by one of Simon's faction murders were committed. 2 Mac. iv. 9.
 By the weight of reason I should counterpoise the overbalancings of any factions. King Charles.
 Tumult; discord; dissension.
 They remained at Newbery in great faction among themselves. Clarendon.

Factionary
Fa'ctionary. n.s. [factionaire, French.] One of a faction; a party man. A word not in use.
 Pr'ythee, fellow, remember my name is Menenius; always factionary of the party of your general. Shakes. Coriolanus.

Factious
Fa'ctious. adj. [factieux, French.]

 Given to faction; loud and violent in a party; publickly dissensious; addicted to form parties and raise publick disturbances.
 He is a traitor; let him to the Tower, And crop away that factious pate of his. Shakes. Hen. VI.
 Be factious for redress of all these griefs. Shak. Jul. Cæsar.
 Proceeding from publick dissensions; tending to publick discord.
 Grey-headed men and grave, with warriors mix'd, Assemble; and harangues are heard; but soon In factious opposition. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi. l. 664.
 Factious tumults overbore the freedom and honour of the two houses. King Charles.
 Why these factious quarrels, controversies, and battles amongst themselves, when they were all united in the same design? Dryden's Juvenal, Dedication.

Factotum
Facto'tum. n.s. [fac totum, Latin. It is used likewise in burlesque French.] A servant employed alike in all kinds of business: as Scrub in the Stratagem.

Fairy (adjective)
Fa'iry. adj.

 Given by fairies.
 Be secret and discrete; these fairy favours Are lost when not conceal'd. Dryden's Spanish Fryar.
 Such borrowed wealth, like fairy money, though it were gold in the hand from which he received it, will be but leaves and dust when it comes to use. Locke.
 Belonging to fairies.
 This is the fairy land: oh, spight of spights, We talk with goblings, owls, and elvish sprights. Shakesp.

Fairy (noun)
Fai'ry. n.s. [ꝼꞃhð, Saxon; fee, French.]
Ab ἔρα, terra, fit & ϝέρα Macedonum dialecto; unde ἔνεροι ἔνϝεροι, & Romanis inferi, qui Scoto-Saxonibus dicuntur feries, nostratiq; vulgo corruptius fairies, καταχθόνιοι δαίμονες, sive dii manes. Baxter's Glossary.

 A kind of fabled beings supposed to appear in a diminutive human form, and to dance in the meadows, and reward cleanliness in houses; an elf, a fay.
 Nan Page, my daughter, and my little son, And three or four more of their growth, we'll dress Like urchins, ouphes, and fairies, green and white, With rounds of waxen tapers on their heads, And rattles in their hands. Shakes. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 Then let them all encircle him about, And fairy like too pinch the unclean knight; And ask him, why, that hour of fairy revel, In their so sacred paths he dares to tread In shape prophane.. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 By the idea any one has of fairies, or centaurs, he cannot know that things, answering those ideas, exist. Locke.
 Fays, fairies, genii, elves, and demons hear. Pope.
 Enchantress. Warburton.
 To this great fairy I'll commend thy acts, Make her thanks bless thee. Shakes. Anth. and Cleopatra.

Faitour
Fa'itour. n.s. [faitard, French] A scoundrel; a rascal; a mean fellow; a poltron. An old word now obsolete.
 To Philemon, false faitour, Philemon, I cast to pay, that I so dearly bought. Fairy Queen, b. ii.
 Into new woes unweeting I was cast, By this false faitour. Fairy Queen, b. i. cant. 4. stan. 47.

Family
Fámily. n.s. [familia, Latin; famille, French.]

 Those who live in the same house; household.
 The night made little impression on myself; but I cannot answer for my whole family; for my wife prevailed on me to take somewhat. Swift.
 Those that descend from one common progenitor; a race; a tribe; a generation.

 A class; a tribe; a species.
 There be two great families of things, sulphureous and mercurial, inflammable and not inflammable, mature and crude, oily and watry. Bacon's Natural History, №. 354.

Fangle
Fa'ngle. n.s. [from ꝼnᵹan, Saxon, to attempt. Skinner.] Silly attempt; trifling scheme. It is never used, or rarely, but in contempt with the epithet new; as, new fangles, new fangleness.

Fangot
Fángot. n.s. [                ] A quantity of wares: as raw silk, &c. containing one or two hundred weight three quarters. Dict.

Fare (verb)
To Fare. v.n. [faran, Saxon; varen, Dutch.]

 To go; to pass; to travel.
 At last, resolving forward still to fare, Until the blust'ring storm is overblown. Fairy Queen, b. i.
 His spirits pure were subject to our sight, Like to a man in shew and shape he fared. Fairfax.
 So on he fares, and to the border comes Of Eden. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. iv. l. 131.
 Sadly they far'd along the sea-beat shore; Still heav'd their hearts. Pope.
 To be in any state good or bad.
 So bids thee well to fare thy nether friend. Fairy Queen.
 A stubborn heart shall fare evil at the Iast. Ecclus. iii. 26.
 Well fare the hand, which to our humble sight Presents that beauty, which the dazzling light Of royal splendor. Waller.
 So in this throng bright Sacharissa far'd, Oppress'd by those who strove to be her guard: As ships, though never so obsequious, fall Foul in a tempest on their admiral. Waller.
 So fares the stag among th' enraged hounds; Repels their force, and wounds returns for wounds. Denh.
 But as a barque, that in foul weather, Toss'd by two adverse winds together, Is bruis'd and beaten to and fro, And knows not which to turn him to; So far'd the knight between two foes, And knew not which of them t' oppose. Hudibras, p. i.
 If you do as I do, you may fare as I fare. L'Estrange.
 Thus fares the queen, and thus her fury blows Amid'st the crowd. Dryden's Æn.
 English ministers never fare so well as in a time of war with a foreign power, which diverts the private feuds and animosities of the nation, and turns their efforts upon the common enemy. Addison's Freeholder, № 49.
 Some give out there is no danger at all; others are comforted that it will be a common calamity, and they shall fare no worse than their neighbours. Swift.
 To proceed in any train of consequences good or bad.
 Thus it fareth when too much desire of contradiction causeth our speeches rather to pass by number than to stay for weight. Hooker, b. ii. s. 5.
 So fares it when with truth falsehood contends. Milton.
 To happen to any one well or ill. With it preceding in an impersonal form.
 When the hand finds itself well warmed and covered, let it refuse the trouble of feeding the mouth, or guarding the head, 'till the body be starved or killed, and then we shall see how it will fare with the hand. South's Sermons.
 To feed; to eat; to be entertained with food.
 The rich man fared sumptuously every day. Luke.
 Feast your ears with the musick awhile, if they will fare so
harshly as on the trumpet's sound. Shakespeare's Timon.
 Men think they have fared hardly, if, in times of extremity, they have descended so low as dogs; but Galen delivereth, that, young, fat, and gelded, they were the food of many nations. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iii. c. 25.

Farinaceous
Farináceous. adj. [from farina, Latin.] Mealy; tasting like meal or flower of corn.
The properest food of the vegetable kingdom for mankind, is taken from the farinaceous or mealy seeds of some culmiferous plants; as oats, barley, wheat, rice, rye, maize, panick, and millet. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Farrier (noun)
Fa'rrier. n.s. [ferrier, French; ferrarius, Latin.]

 A shoer of horses.
But the utmost exactness in these particulars belong to farriers, saddlers, smiths, and other tradesmen. Digby.
 One who professes the medicine of horses.
If you are a piece of a farrier, as every good groom ought to be, get sack, brandy, or strong beer to rub your horses. Swift's Directions to the Groom.

Farrier (verb)
To Fa'rrier. v.n. [from the noun.]  To practise physick or chirurgery on horses.
Though there are many pretenders to the art of farriering and cowleeching, yet many of them are very ignorant. Mort.

Farrow (noun)
Fa'rrow. n.s. [ꝼaꞃh, Saxon.]  A little pig.
Pour in sow's blood that hath litter'd Her nine farrow. Shakespeare's Macbeth.

Farrow (verb)
To Fa'rrow. v.a.  To bring pigs.  It is used only of swine.
Sows ready to farrow this time of the year, Are for to be made of. Tuss. Husb.
The swine, although multiparous, yet being being bisulcous, and only cloven-hoofed, is farrowed with open eyes, as other bisulcous animals. Brown.
Ev'n her, who did her numerous offspring boast, As fair and fruitful as the sow that carry'd The thirty pigs, at one large litter farrow'd. Dryd. Juven.

Fart (noun)
Fart. n.s. [fert, Saxon.] Wind from behind.
Love is the fartOf every heart;It pains a man when 'tis kept close;And others doth offend, when 'tis let loose. Suckling.

Fart (verb)
To Fart. v.a. [from the noun.] To break wind behind.
As when we a gun discharge,Although the bore be ne'er so large,Before the flame from muzzle burst,Just at the breech it flashes first;So from my lord his passion broke,He farted first, and then he spoke. Swift.

Farther (adjective)
Fa'rther. adj. [supposed from far, more, probably from forth.]

 More remote.
 Let me add a farther truth, that without those ties of gratitude, I have a most particular inclination to honour you. Dryden's Juven. Dedication.
 Longer; tending to greater distance.
 Before our farther way the fates allow, Here must we fix on high the golden bough. Dryden's Æn.

Farther (adverb)
Fa'rther. adv. [This word is now generally considered as the comparative degree of far; but by no analoger can far make farther or farthest: it is therefore probable, that the ancient orthography was nearer the true, and that we ought to write further and furthest, from forth, forther, forthest, ꝼoꞃðoꞃ, ꝼuꞃðꞃ, Saxon; the o and u, by resemblance of sound, being first confounded in speech, and afterwards in books.]  At a greater distance; to a greater distance; more remotely; beyond; moreover.
 To make a perfect judgment of good pictures, when compared with one another, besides rules, there is farther required a long conversation with the best pieces. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 They contented themselves with the opinions, fashions and things of their country, without looking any farther. Locke.

Farther (verb)
To Fa'rther. v.a. [more proper To further.] To promote; to facilitate; to advance.
 If he had farthered or hindered the taking of the town, Dryden's Dedicat. to the Æn.

Fartherance
Fa'rtherance. n.s. [more properly furtherance, from further.] Encouragement; promotion.
That was the foundation of the learning I have, and of all the fartherance that I have obtained. Ascham's Schoolmaster.

Farthermore
Farthermo're. adv. [more properly furthermore.] Besides; over and above; likewise.
 Farthermore the leaves, body and boughs of this tree, by so much exceed all other plants, as the greatest men of power and worldly ability surpass the meanest. Raleigh's History.

Farthest (adjective)
Fa'rthest. adj. Most distant; remotest.
Yet it must be withal considered, that the greatest part of the world are as they which be farthest from perfection. Hooker.

Farthest (adverb)
Fa'rthest. adv. [more properly furthest. See Farther.]

 At the greatest distance.

 To the greatest distance.

Farthing
Fa'rthing. n.s. [ꝼoꞃðlinᵹ, Saxon, from ꝼoƿꞃ, four, that is the fourth part of a penny.]

 The fourth of a penny; the smallest English coin.
 A farthing is the least denomination or fraction of money used in England. Cocker's Arithmetick.
 Else all those things we toil so hard in, Would not avail one single farthing. Prior.
 Copper money.
 The parish find, 'tis true; but our church-wardens Feed on the silver, and give us the farthings. Gay.
 You are not obliged to take money not of gold or silver; not the halfpence or farthings of England. Swift.
 It is used sometimes in a sense hyperbolical: as, it is not worth a farthing; or proverbial.
 His son builds on, and never is content, 'Till the last farthing is in structure spent. Dryden's Juven.

Farthingale
Fa'rthingale. n.s. [This word has much exercised the etymology of Skinner, who at last seems to determine that it is derived from vertu garde: if he had considered what vert signifies in Dutch, he might have found out the true sense.] A hoop; circles of whalebone used to spread the petticoat to a wide circumference.
With silken coats, and caps, and golden rings With ruffs, and cuffs, and farthingales, and things. Shakesp.
                         Tell me, What compass will you wear your farthingale? Shakesp.
                     Arthur wore in hall Round table, like a farthingal. Hudibras, p. i. cant. 1.
Some will have it that it portends the downfal of the French king; and observe, that the farthingale appeared in England a little before the ruin of the Spanish monarchy. Addison.
                     She seems a medley of all ages, With a huge farthingale to swell her fustian stuff, A new commode, a topknot, and a ruff. Swift.

Farthingsworth
Fa'rthingsworth. n.s. [farthing and worth.] As much as is sold for a farthing.
 They are thy customers; I hardly ever sell them a farthingsworth of any thing. Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.

Fasces
Fa'sces. n.s. [Latin.] Rods anciently carried before the consuls as a mark of their authority.
The duke beheld, like Scipio, with disdain, That Carthage, which he ruin'd, rise once more; And shook aloft the fasces of the main, To fright those slaves with what they felt before. Dryden.

Fascia
Fáscia. n.s. [Latin.] A fillet; a bandage.

Fasciated
Fa'sciated. adj. [from  fascia.] Bound with fillets; tied with a bandage. Dict.

Fasciation
Fascia'tion. n.s. [from fascia.] Bandage; the act or manner of binding diseased parts.
Three especial sorts of fasciation, or rowling, have the worthies of our profession commended to posterity. Wiseman.

Fascinate
To Fa'scinate. v.a. [fascino, Latin.] To bewitch; to enchant; to influence in some wicked and secret manner.
There be none of the affections which have been noted to fascinate or bewitch, but love and envy. Bacon, Essay 9.
Such a fascinating sin this is, as allows men no liberty of consideration. Decay of Piety.

Fascination
Fascina'tion. n.s. [from fascinate.] The power or act of bewitching; enchantment; unseen inexplicable influence.
He had such a crafty and bewitching fashion, both to move pity and to induce belief, as was like a kind of fascination and enchantment to those that saw him or heard him. Bacon.
The Turks hang old rag, or such like ugly things, upon their fairest horses, and other goodly creatures, to secure them against fascination. Wader.
There is a certain bewitchery or fascination in words, which makes them operate with a force beyond what we can naturally give an account of. South's Sermons.

Fascine
Fáscine. n.s. [French.] A faggot. Military cant.
 The black prince passed many a river without the help of pontoons, and filled a ditch with faggots as successfully as the generals of our times do with fascines. Addison's Spectator.

Fascinous
Fáscinous. adj. [fascinum, Latin.] Caused or acting by witchcraft, or enchantment.
 I shall not discuss the possibility of fascinous diseases, farther than refer to experiment. Harvey on Consumptions.

Fashion (noun)
Fáshion. n.s. [façon, French; facies, Latin.]

 Form; make; state of any thing with regard to its outward appearance.
 They pretend themselves grieved at our solemnities in erecting churches, at their form and fashion, at the stateliness of them and costliness, and at the opinion which we have of  them. Hooker, b. v. s. 17.
 The fashion of his countenance was altered. Luke ix. 29.
 Stand these poor people's friend.— I will, Or let me lose the fashion  of a man: Shakes. Henry VIII.
 The make or cut of cloaths.
 I'll be at charges for a looking-glass, And entertain a score or two of taylors, To study fashions to adorn my body. Shakes. Richard III.
 You, sir, I entertain for one of my hundred; only, I do not like the fashion of your garments. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Manner; sort; way.
             For that I love your daughter In such a righteous fashion as I do, Perforce against all checks, rebukes, and manners, I must advance. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
             Pluck Casca by the sleeve, And he will, after his four fashion, tell you What hath proceeded. Shakespeare's Julius Cæsar.
 The commissioners either pulled down or defaced all images in churches; and that in such unseasonable and unseasoned fashion, as if it had been done in hostility against them. Hayw.
 Custom operating upon dress, or any domestick ornaments.
                     Here's the note How much your chain weighs to the utmost caret, The fineness of the gold, the chargeful fashion. Shakespeare.
 Custom; general practice.
 Zelmane again, with great admiration, begun to speak of him; asking whether it were the fashion or no, in Arcadia, that shepherds should perform such valorous enterprizes. Sidn.
 Though the truth of this hath been universally acknowledged, yet because the fashion of the age is to call every thing into question, it will be requisite to satisfy mens reason about it. Tillotson, Sermon 3.
 Why truly, wife, it was not easily reconciled to the common method; but then it was the fashion to do such things. Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.
 Manner imitated from another; way established by precedent.
 Sorrow so royally in you appears, That I will deeply put the fashion on, And wear it in my heart. Shakespeare.
 General approbation; mode.
 A young gentleman accommodates himself to the innocent diversions in fashion. Locke.
 His panegyricks were bestowed only on such persons as he had familiarly known, and only at such times as others cease to praise, when out of power, or out of fashion. Pope.
 Rank; condition above the vulgar. It is used in a sense below that of quality.
 It is strange that men of fashion, and gentlemen, should so grosly belie their own knowledge. Raleigh.
 Any thing worn.
 Now, by this maiden blossom in my hand, I scorn thee, and thy fashion, peevish boy. Shak. Hen. VI.
 The farcy; a distemper in horses; the horses leprosy. A barbarous word.
 His horse is possest with the glanders, infected with the fashions, and full of windgalls. Shak. Taming of the Shrew.

Fashion (verb)
To Fa'shion. v.a. [façonner, French, from the noun.]

 To form; to mould; to figure.
He loves me well, and I have giv'n him reasons; Send him but hither, and I'll fashion him. Shak. Jul. Cæsar.
Did not he that made me in the womb, make him? And did not one fashion us in the womb? Job xxxi 15.
The graves of the rebellious generations were already fashioned in the clouds, which soon after should swallow up all living creatures. Raleigh's History of the World.
The rib he form'd, and fashion'd with his hands:Under his forming hands a creature grew,Man like, but different sex. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. viii.
Inability will every one find in himself, who shall go about to fashion in his understanding any simple idea, not received by his senses from external objects, or by reflection from the operations of his mind about them. Locke.
How could this noble fabrick be design'd,And fashion'd, by a maker brute and blind?Could it be of art such miracles invent?And raise a beautious world of such extent? Blackm. Creat.
A different toil another forge employs,Here the loud hammer fashions female toys;Each trinket that adorns the modern dame,First to these little artists ow'd its frame. Gay's Fan.
 To fit; to adapt; to accommodate.
Laws ought to be fashioned unto the manners and conditions of the poeple to whom they are meant, and not to be imposed upon them according to the simple rule of right. Spenser.
 Ne do, I doubt, but that ye well can fashion Yourselves thereto, according to occasion. Hubb. Tale.
 Nature, as it grows again tow'rds earth, Is fashion'd for the journey, dull and heavy. Shakes. Timon.
                           This cardinal, Though from an humble stock undoubtedly, Was fashion'd to much honour from his cradle. Sh. H. VIII.
 To cast into external appearance.
It better fits my blood to be disdained of all, than to fashion a carriage to rob love from any. Sh. Much Ado about Nothing.
 To make according to the rule prescribed by custom.
The value of the labour employed about one parcel of silver more than another, makes a difference in their price; and thus fashioned plate sells for more than its weight. Locke.

Fashionable
Fa'shionable. adj. [from fashion.]

Approved by custom; established by custom; modish.
The eminence of your condition, and the gallantry of your principles, will invite gentlemen to the useful and ennobling study of nature, and make philosophy fashionable. Glan.
Examine how the fashionable practice of the world can be reconciled to this important doctrine of our religion. Rogers.
'Tis prevailing example that hath now made it fashionable. Benley.
 Made according to the mode.
Rich, fashionable robes her person deck; Pendants her ears, and pearls adorn her neck. Dryd. Ovid.
 Observant of the mode.
              Time is like a fashionable host,That slightly shakes his parting guest by th' hand; But with his arms outstretch'd, as he would fly, Grasps in the corner: welcome ever smiles, And farewell goes out sighing. Shakes. Troilus and Cressida.
 Having rank above the vulgar, and below nobility.

Fashionableness
Fa'shionableness. n.s. [from fashionable.] Modish elegance; such appearance as is according to present custom.
Why should they not continue to value themselves for this outside fashionableness of the taylor or tirewoman's making, when their parents have so early instructed them to do so? Locke.

Fashionably
Fa'shionably. adv. [from fashionable.] In a manner conformable to custom; with modish elegance.
He must at length die dully of old age at home, when here he might so fashionably and genteelly have  been duelled or fluxed into another world. South's Sermons.

Fashionist
Fa'shionist. n.s. [from fashion.] A follower of the mode; a fop; a coxcomb.

Fast (adjective)
Fast. adj. [ꝼæꞅꞇ, Saxon.]

 Firm; immoveable.
 He by his strength setteth fast mountains. Ps. lxv. 6.
  Last, the sire and his three sons, With their four wives; and God made fast the door. Milt.
                  Be sure to find, What I foretold thee, many a hard assay Of dangers and adversities, and pains, Ere thou of Isreael's sceptre get fast hold. Milt.  Par. Reg.
 Strong; impregnable.
 England, by report of the chronicles, was infested with robbers and outlaws; which, lurking in woods and fast places, used often to break forth to rob and spoil. Spenser on Ireland.
 Fixed.
 Lodronius, with the breaking in and force of the horsemen, was driven into a marsh; where, after that he, being sore wounded, and almost fast in the deep mud, had done the uttermost of that his last endeavour, he yielded himself. Knolles.
 A man in a boat, who tugs at a rope that's fast to a ship, looks as if he resolved the ship to help him. Temple.
 Deep; sound.
 I have seen her rise from her bed, take paper, fold it, seal it, and again return to bed; yet all this while in a most fast sleep. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 Firm in adherence.
 Quick wits be in desire new-fangled; in purpose, unconstant; light to promise any thing; ready to forget every thing, both benefit and injury; and thereby neither fast to friend, nor fearful to foe. Ascham's Schoolmaster.
 [from ffest, Welsh, quick] Speedy; quick; swift.
 This work goeth fast on, and prospereth in their hands. Ezra v. viii.
 Skill comes so slow, and life so fast doth fly, We learn so little, and forget so much. Davies.
 The prince growth up fast to be a man, and is of a sweet and excellent disposition:  it would be a stain upon you if you should mislead, or suffer him to be misled. Bacon to Villiers.
 Fast and loose. Uncertain; variable; inconstant; deceitful.
 A rope of fair pearl, which now hiding, now hidden by the hair, did, as it were, play at fast and loose each with other, giving and receiving richness. Sidney.
 If she perceived by his outward chear, That any would his love by talk bewray, Sometimes she heard him, sometimes stopt her ear, And play'd fast and loose the live-long day. Fairfax, b.v.
 The folly and wickedness of men, that think to play fast and loose with God Almighty! L'Estrange.
 If they cohered, yet by the next conflict with other atoms they might be separated again; and so on in an eternal vicissitude of fast and loose, without ever consociating into the huge condense bodies of planets. Bentley's Sermons.

Fast (noun)
Fast. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Abstinence from food.
 A thousand men have broke their fasts today, That ne'er shall dine, unless thou yield the crown. Shakes.
 Where will this end?  Four times ten days I've pass'd, Wand'ring this woody maze, and human food Nor tasted, nor had appetite; that fast To virtue I impute not, or count part Of what I suffer here. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.
 Happy and innocent were the ages of our fore-fathers, who broke their fasts with herbs and roots; and when they were permitted flesh, eat it only dressed with hunger and fire. Taylor.
 She's gone unkindly, and refus'd to cast One glance to feed me for so long a fast. Dryd. Tyran. Love.
 Religious mortification by abstinence; religious humiliation.
 We humble ourselves before God this day, not merely by the outward solemnities of a fast, but with afflicting our souls as well as bodies for our sins. Atterbury's Sermons.
 Nor pray'rs nor fasts its stubborn pulse restrain; Nor tears, for ages, taught to flow in vain. Pope.

Fast (verb)
To Fast. v.n. [fastan, Gothick; ꝼæꞅꞇan, Saxon.]

 To abstain from food.
 Our love is not so great, Hortensio, But we may blow our nails together, And fast it fairly out. Shak. Taming of the Shrew.
 I had rather fast from all four days than drink so much in one. Shakespeare's Anthony and Cleopatra.
 We have some meats, and breads, and drinks, which taken by men enable them to fast long after. Bacon's New Atlantis.
 To mortify the body by religious abstinence.
 When thou fastest, anoint thy head and wash thy face, that thou appear not unto men to fast. Mat. vi.
 Last night the very god shew'd me a vision: I fast, and pray'd for their intelligence. Shakes. Cymbeline.

Father (noun)
Fa'ther. n.s. [ꝼæðꞃ, Saxon; aoher, Erse. This word is found likewise in the Persian language.]

 He by whom the son or daughter is begotten.
 Father is a notion superinduced to the substance, or man, and refers only to an act of that thing called man, whereby he contributed to the generation of one of his own kind. Locke.
 Son of Bensalem, thy father saith it; the man by whom thou hast breath and life speaketh the word. Bacon.
                      He shall forget Father and mother, and to his wife adhere. Milt. Pa. Lost.
 The first ancestor.
                          It was said It should not stand in thy posterity; But that myself should be the root and father Of many kings. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 Abraham is the father of us all. Rom. iv. 16.
 The appellation of an old man.
 A poor blind man was accounted cunning in prognosticating weather: Epsom, a lawyer, said in scorn, Tell me, father, when doth the sun change? The old man answered, when such a wicked lawyer as you goeth to heaven. Camden.
 The title of any man reverend for age, learning, and piety.
              You shall find one well accompanied With reverend fathers and well learned bishops. Sh. R III.
 One who has given original to any thing good or bad.
 Jubal was the father of all such as handle the harp and organ. Gen. iv. 21.
 The ecclesiastical writers of the first centuries.
 Men may talk of the fathers, and magnify the fathers, and seem to make the authority of the fathers next to infallible; and yet none expose them more to contempt than they which give such answers as these. Stillingfleet.
 One who acts with paternal care and tenderness.
 I was a father to the poor. Job xxix. 16.
 He hath made me a father to Pharaoh, and lord of all his house. Gen. xlv. 8.
 The title of a popish confessor, particularly of a Jesuit.
                         Formal in apparel, In gait and countenance surely like a father. Shakespeare.
 There was in this place a father of a convent, who was very much renowned for his piety and exemplary life; and as it is usual, under any great affliction, to apply themselves to the most eminent confessors, our beautiful votary took the opportunity of confessing herself to this celebrated father. Add.
 The title of a senator of old Rome.
 From hence the race of Alban fathers come, And the long glories of majestick Rome. Dryden's Virgil.
 The appellation of the first person of the adorable Trinity.
 The eternal son of God esteemed it his meat and drink to do the will of his Father, and for his obedience alone obtained the greatest glory. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
 The compellation of God as Creator.
 We have one Father, even God. John viii. 41.
 Almighty and most merciful Father. Common Prayer.

Fatherless


Fawn (noun)
Fawn. n.s. [faon, French, from fan, in old French a child, probably from infans, Latin.] A young deer.
Looking my love, I go from place to place, Like a young fawn that late hath lost the hind; And seek each where, where last I saw her face, Whose image yet I carry fresh in mind. Spenser's Sonnets.
The buck is called the first year a fawn, the second year a pricket. Shakespeare's Love's Labour Lost.
The colt hath about four years of growth; and so the fawn, and so the calf. Bacon's Natural History, №. 759.
Who for thy table feeds the wanton fawn,  For him as kindly spreads the flow'ry lawn. Pope.

Fawn (verb)


Fawner
Fa'wner. n.s. [from fawn.] One that fawns; one that pays servile courtship.
By softness of behaviour we have arrived at the appellation of fawners. Spectator, №. 304.

Fawningly
Fa'wningly. adv. [from fawn.] In a cringing servile way.

Faxed
Fa'xed. adj. [from ꝼæx, Saxon, hair.] Hairy. Now obsolete.
They could call a comet a faxed star, which is all one with stella crinita, or cometa. Camden's Remains.

Fay


Feaberry


Feague


Fealty


Fear (noun 1)
Fear. n.s. [ꝼaꞃan, Sax. to fear; vaer, Dut. feakle, Erse.]

 Dread; horrour; painful apprehension of danger.
 Fear is an uneasiness of the mind, upon the thought of future evil likely to befal us. Locke.
 Treambling fear still to and fro did fly, And found no place where safe she shrowd him might. F. Q.
 For fear was upon them, because of the people of those countries. Ezra iii. 3.
 What then remains? Are we depriv'd of will?Must we not wish, for fear of wishing ill? Dryden's Juv.
 Fear, in general, is that passion of our nature whereby we are excited to provide for our security upon the approach of evil. Rogers, Sermon 1.
 Awe; dejection of mind at the presence of any person or thing.
 And the fear of you, and the dread of you, shall be upon every beast. Gen. ix. 2.
 Anxiety; solicitude.
 The greatest and principal fear was for the holy temple. 2 Mac. xv. 18.
 That which causes fear.
              Antony, stay not by his side: Thy demon, that's the spirit that keeps thee, is Noble, courageous, high, unmatchable, Where Cæsar's is not; but near him, thy angel Becomes a fear, as being o'erpower'd. Shak. Ant. and Cleop.
 The object of fear.
 Except the God of Abraham and the fear of Isaac had been with me. Gen. xxxi. 42.
 Something hung up to scare deer by its colour or noise.
 He who fleeth from the noise of the fear shall fall into the pit, and he that cometh up out of the midst of the pit shall be taken in the snare. Is. xxiv. 18.

Fear (noun 2)
Fear. n.s. [ꝼoꞃa, Saxon.] A companion. Obsolete.
             But fair Charissa to a lovely fear
Was linked, and by him had many pledges dear. Fairy Qu.

Fear (verb active)
To Fear. v.a. [ꝼaꞃan, Saxon.]

 To dread; to consider with apprehensions of terrour; to be afraid of.
 Now, for my life, Hortensio fears his widow. — Then never trust me if I be afraid. — You are very sensible, yet you miss my sense; I mean Hortensio is afraid of you. Shakes. Tam. of the Shrew.
 To fear the foe, since fear oppresseth strength, Gives, in your weakness, strength unto your foe. Sh. R. II.
 There shall rise up a kingdom, and it shall be feared above all the kingdoms before it. 2 Esdr. xii. 13.
When I view the beauties of thy face, I fear not death, nor dangers, nor disgrace. Dryden.
 To fright; to terrify; to make afraid.
 The inhabitants, being feared with the Spaniards landing and burning, fled from their dwellings. Carew.
 If he be taken, he shall never more Be fear'd of doing harm: make your own purpose How in my strength you please. Shakes. King Lear.
 We must not make a scarecrow of the law, Setting it up to fear the birds of prey. Sh. Meas. for Meas.
 Some, sitting on the hatches, would seem there, With hideous gazing, to fear away fear. Donne.

Fear (verb neuter)
To Fear. v.n.

 To live in horrour; to be afraid.
 Well you may fear too far. — Safer than trust too far: Let me still take away the harms I fear, Not fear still to be harm'd. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 To be anxious.
                  If any such be here, if any fear Less for his person than an ill report; If any think brave death outweighs bad life. Shak. Coriolan.
 Then let the greedy merchant fear For his ill-gotten gain; And pray to gods that will not hear, While the debating winds and billows bear His wealth into the main. Dryden's Horace.
 See, pious king, with diff'rent strife, Thy struggling Albion's bosom torn: So much she fears for William's life, That Mary's fate she dare not morn. Prior.

Fearful
Fe'arful. adj. [fear and full.]

 Timorous; timid; easily made afraid.
          He's gentle, and not fearful. Shakespeare's Tempest.
 Afraid. It has of before the object of fear.
 The Irish are more fearful to offend the law than the English. Davie on Ireland.
 I have made my heroine fearful of death, which neither Cassandra nor Cleopatra would have been. Dryd. Auren. Pref.
 Awful; to be reverenced.
 Who is like thee, glorious in holiness, fearful in praises. Ex. xv. 11.
 Terrible; dreadful; frightful; impressing fear.
 Neither fast to friend, nor fearful to foe. Ascham's Schoolm.
 Against such monsters God maintained his own, by fearful execution of extraordinary judgment upon them. Hooker.
 What God did command touching Canaan, concerneth not us any otherwise than only as a fearful pattern of his just displeasure. Hooker, b. v. s . 17.
 All torment, trouble, wonder, and amazement Inhabits here: some heav'nly power guide us Out of this fearful country. Shakespeare's Tempest.
 It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living God. Hebr. x. 31.
 Lay down by those pleasures the fearful and dangerous thunders and lightnings, the horrible and frequent earthquakes, and then there will be found no comparison. Raleigh.
 This is the natural fruit of sin, and the present revenge which it takes upon sinners, besides that fearful punishment which shall be inflicted on them in another life. Tillotson.

Feculence
Féculence.Féculency.

n.s. [fæculentia, Latin.]



 Muddiness; quality of abounding with lees or sediment.

 Lees; feces; sediment; dregs.
Pour upon it some very strong lee, to facilitate the separation of its feculencies. Boyle.
Whether the wilding's fibres are contriv'dTo draw th' earth's purest spirit, and resistIts feculence, which in more porous stocksOf cyder plants finds passage free. Phillips.

Feculency
Féculence.Féculency.

n.s. [fæculentia, Latin.]



 Muddiness; quality of abounding with lees or sediment.

 Lees; feces; sediment; dregs.
Pour upon it some very strong lee, to facilitate the separation of its feculencies. Boyle.
Whether the wilding's fibres are contriv'dTo draw th' earth's purest spirit, and resistIts feculence, which in more porous stocksOf cyder plants finds passage free. Phillips.

Fellow (noun)
Féllow. n.s. [quasi, to follow, Minshew; from fe, faith, and laʒg, bound, Saxon, Junius; fallow, Scottish.]

 A companion; one with whom we consort.
In youth I had twelve fellows like unto myself, but not one of them came to a good end. Ascham's Schoolmaster.
                To be your fellow,You may deny me; but I'll be your servant,Whether you will or no. Shakespeare's Tempest.
Have we not plighted each our holy oath,That one should be the common good of both;One soul should both inspire, and neither proveHis fellow's hindrance in pursuit of love? Dryden.
 An associate; one united in the same affair.
Each on his fellow for assistance calls;At length the fatal fabrick mounts the walls. Dryden's Virg.
 One of the same kind.
Let partial spirits still aloud complain,Think themselves injur'd that they cannot reign;And own no liberty, but where they mayWithout controul upon their fellows prey. Waller.
A shepherd had one favourite dog: he fed him with his own hand, and took more care of him than of any of his fellows. L'Estrange's Fables.
 Equal; peer.
                Chieftain of the restI chose him here: the earth shall him allow;His fellows late, shall be his subjects now. Fairfax, b. i.
So you are to be hereafter fellows, and no longer servants. Sidney.
 One thing suited to another; one of a pair.
When virtue is lodged in a body, that seems to have been prepared for the reception of vice: the soul and the body do not seem to be fellows. Addison's Spectator, № 86.
 One like another: as, this knave hath not his fellow.

 A familiar appellation used sometimes with fondness; sometimes with esteem; but generally with some degree of contempt.
This is Othello's ancient, as I take it.— The same indeed; a very valiant fellow. Shakes. Othello.
An officer was in danger to have lost his place, but his wife made his peace; whereupon a pleasant fellow said, that he had been crushed, but that he saved himself upon his horns. Bacon, Apophthegm 4.
Full fifteen thousand lusty fellowsWith fire and sword the fort maintain;Each was a Hercules, you tell us,Yet out they march'd like common men. Prior.
 A word of contempt: the foolish mortal; the mean wretch; the sorry rascal.
Those great fellows scornfully receiving them, as foolish birds fallen into their net, it pleased the eternal justice to make them suffer death by their hands. Sidney, b. ii.
Cassio hath here been set on in the darkBy Rodorigo, and fellows that are 'scap'd:He's almost slain, and Rodorigo dead. Shakesp. Othello.
I have great comfort from this fellow: methinks he hath no drowning mark about him; his complexion is perfect gallows. Shakespeare's Tempest.
Opinion, that did help me to the crown,Had still kept loyal to possession;And left me in reputeless banishment,A fellow of no mark nor likelihood. Shakesp. Henry IV.
How oft the sight of means, to do ill deeds,Makes deeds ill done? for had'st not thou been by,A fellow by the hand of nature mark'd,Quoted, and sign'd to do a deed of shame,This murder had not come into my mind. Shakes. K. John.
The Moor's abus'd by some most villainous knave,Some base notorious knave, some scurvy fellow. Shak. Othell.
The fellow had taken more fish than he could spend while they were sweet. L'Estrange.
As next of kin, Achilles' arms I claim;This fellow would ingraft a foreign nameUpon our stock, and the Sisyphian seedBy fraud and theft asserts his father's breed. Dryden.
You will wonder how such an ordinary fellow, as this Mr. Wood, could have got his majesty's broad seal. Swift.
You'll find, if once the monarch acts the monk,Or, cobler like, the parson will be drunk,Worth makes the man, and want of it the fellow;The rest is all but leather and prunella. Pope's Ess. on Man.
 Sometimes it implies a mixture of pity with contempt.
The provost commanded his men to hang him up on the nearest tree: then the fellow cried out that he was not the miller, but the miller's man. Hayward.
 A member of a college that shares its revenues.

Fellow-student
Fellow-stúdent. n.s. One who studies in company with another.
 I pr'ythee, do not mock me, fellowstudent; I think it was to see my mother's wedding. Shakes. Hamlet.
 If you have no fellowstudent at hand, tell it over with your acquaintance. Watt's Logick.

Felo-de-se
Felo-de-se. n.s. [In law.] He that committeth felony by murdering himself.

Female (adjective)
Fémale. adj.

 Not masculine; belonging to a she.
 If by a female hand he had foreseen He was to die, his wish had rather been The lance and double ax of the fair warrior queen. Dryd.
 Female Rhymes. Double rhymes so called, because in French, from which the term is taken, they end in e weak or feminine.  These rhymes are female:
Th' excess of heat is but a fable;We know the torrid zone is now found habitable. Cowley.
 The female rhymes are in use with the Italian in every line, with the Spaniard promiscuously, and with the French alternately, as appears from the Alarique, the Pucelle, or any of their later poems. Dryden's Preface to Ann. Mirab.

Female (noun)
Fémale. n.s. [femelle, French; femella, Latin.] A she; one of the sex which brings young.
 God created man in his own image, male and female created he them. Gen. i. 27.
                 Man, more divine, Lord of the wide world, and wide wat'ry seas, Indu'd with intellectual sense and soul, Are masters to their females, and their lords. Shakespeare.

Feminine (adjective)
Féminine. adj. [fæmininus, Latin.]

 Of the sex that brings young; female.
Thus we chastise the god of wineWith water that is feminine,Until the cooler nymph abateHis wrath, and so concorporate. Cleaveland.
 Soft; tender; delicate.
                        Her heav'nly formAngelick, but more soft and feminine. Milton's Parad. Lost.
 Effeminate; emasculated.
Ninias was no man of war at all, but altogether feminine and subjected to ease and delicacy. Raleigh's Hist. of the World.

Feminine (noun)
Féminine. n.s. A she; one of the sex that brings young; a female.
            O! why did God create at lastThis novelty on earth, this fair defectOf nature? And not fill the world at onceWith men, as angels, without feminine? Milt. Par. Lost.

Ferment (verb active)
To Fermént. v.a. [fermento, Latin; fermenter, French.] To exalt or rarify by intestine motion of parts.
 Ye vig'rous swains! while youth ferments your blood, And purer spirits swell the sprightly flood, Now range the hills, the thickest woods beset, Wind the shrill horn, or spread the waving net. Pope.

Feuillage
Féuillage. n.s. [French.] A bunch or row of leaves.
 I have done Homer's head; and I inclose the outline, that you may determine whether you would have it so large, or reduced to make room for feuillage or laurel round the oval. Jervas to Pope.

Feuillemort
Féuillemort. n.s. [French.] The colour of a faded leaf, corrupted commonly to philemot.

Feuterer
Féuterer. n.s. A dogkeeper: perhaps the cleaner of the kennel.

Few
Few. adj. [fewo, feowa, Saxon; fua, Danish.]

 Not many; not in a great number.
 We are left but few of many. Jer.
 So much the thirst of honour fires the blood; So many would be great, so few be good; For who would virtue for herself regard, Or wed without the portion of reward? Dryd. Juvenal.
 On Winter seas, we fewer storms behold, Than foul diseases that infect the fold. Dryden's Virg. Geor.
 Men have fewer or more simple ideas from without, according as the objects they converse with afford greater or less variety. Locke.
 The fewer still you name, you wound the more; Bond is but one, but Harpax is a score. Pope's Hor. Imitat.
 Party is the madness of many, for the game of a few. Swift.
 The imagination of a poet is a thing so nice and delicate, that it is no easy matter to find out images capable of giving pleasure to one of the few, who, in any age, have come up to that character. Berkley to Pope.
 Sometimes elliptically; not many words.
 To answer both allegations at once, the very substance of that they contain is in few but this. Hooker, b. v. s. 22.
 So having said, he thus to Eve in few: Say, woman, what is this which thou hast done? Milton.
 Thus Jupiter in few unfolds the charge. Dryden's Æn.
 The firm resolve I here in few disclose. Pope's Odyssey.

Fico
Fíco. n.s. [Italian.] An act of contempt done with the fingers, expressing a fig for you.
 Having once recovered his fortress, he then gives the fico to all that his adversaries can by siege, force, or famine attempt against him. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.

Figure-Flinger
Figure-Flinger. n.s. [figure and fling.] A pretender to astrology and prediction.
Quacks, figure-flingers, pettifoggers, and republican plotters cannot well live without it. Collier of Confidence.

Filaceous
Fila'ceous. adj. [from filum, Lat.] Consisting of threads; composed of threads.
They make cables of the bark of lime-trees: it is the stalk that maketh the filaceous matter commonly, and sometimes the down that groweth above. Bacon's Natural History.

Filacer
Fi'lacer. n.s. [filazarius, low Lat. filum.] An officer in the Common Pleas, so called because he files those writs whereon he makes process.  There are fourteen of them in their several divisions and counties: they make out all original process, as well real as personal and mixt. Harris.

Filament
Fi'lament. n.s. [filament, Fr. filamenta, Latin.] A slender thread; a body slender and long like a thread.
The effluvium passing out in a smaller thread, and more enlightened filament, it stirreth not the bodies interposed. Bro.
The lungs of consumptives have been consumed, nothing remaining but the ambient membrane, and a number of withered veins and filaments. Harvey on Consumptions.
The ever-rolling orb's impulsive ray On the next threads and filaments does bear, Which form the springy texture of the air And those still strike the next, 'till to the sight The quick vibration propagates the light. Blackm. Creation.
The dung of horses is nothing but the filaments of the hay, and as such combustible. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Filbert
Fi'lbert. n.s. [This is derived by Junius and Skinner from the long beards or husks, as corrupted from full beard, or full of beard. It probably had its name, like many other fruits, from some one that introduced or cultivated it; and is therefore corrupted from Filbert or Filibert, the name of him who brought it hither.] A fine hazel nut with a thin shell.
In August comes fruit of all forts; as plumbs, pears, apricots, barberries, filberts, muskmelons, monkshoods of all colours. Bacon, Essay 47.
Thou hast a brain, such as it is indeed! On what else should thy worm of fancy feed? Yet in a filbert I have often known Maggots survive, when all the kernel's gone. Dorset.
There is also another kind, called the filbert of Constantinople; the leaves and fruit of which are bigger than either of the former: the best are those of a thin shell. Mortimer.

Filch
To Filch. v.a. [A word of uncertain etymology. The French word filer, from which some derive it, is of very late production, and therefore cannot be its original.] To steal; to take by theft; to pilfer; to pillage; to rob; to take by robbery. It is usually spoken of petty thefts.
He shall find his wealth wonderfully enlarged by keeping his cattle in inclosures, where they shall always have safe being, that none are continually filched and stolen. Spenser.
The champion robbeth by night, And prowleth and filcheth by daie. Tusser's Husbandry.
Who steals my purse, steals trash; 'tis something, nothing; 'Twas mine, 'tis his, and has been slave to thousands; But he that filches from me my good name, Robs me of that which not enriches him, And makes me poor indeed. Shakespeare's Othello.
His thefts were too open; his filching was like an unskillful singer, he kept no time. Shakes. Merry Wives of Windsor.
He could discern cities like hives of bees, wherein every bee did nought else but sting; some like hornets, some like filching wasps, others as drones. Burton on Melancholy.
What made thee venture to betray, And filch the lady's heart away. Hudibras, p. iii. cant. 1.
The pismire was formerly a husbandman, that secretly filched away his neighbour's goods. L'Estrange's Fables.
Fain would they filch that little food away, While unrestraine'd those happy gluttons prey. Dryden.
So speeds the wily fox, alarm'd by fear, Who lately filch'd the turkey's callow care. Gay's Trivia.

Filcher
Fi'lcher. n.s. [from filch.] A thief; a petty robber.

Finance
Fínance. n.s. [French.] Revenue; income; profit. It is seldom used in the singular.
 This sort of finance hath been increased by this new device. Bacon's Off. of Alienation.
 The residue of these ordinary finances be casual or uncertain; as be the escheats and forfeitures. Bacon.
 His pretence for making war upon his neighbours was their pyracies, though he practised the same trade when he was straitened in his finances at the siege of Byzantium. Arbuthnot.

Finesse
Finésse. n.s. [French.] Artifice; stratagem: an unnecessary word which is creeping into the language.
 A circumstance not much to be stood upon, in case it were not upon some finess. Hayward.

First (adjective)
First. adj. [ꝼıꞃꞅꞇ, Saxon.]

 The ordinal of one; that which is in order before any other.
                             Thy air, Thou other gold-bound brow, is like the first. — A third is like the former. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 In the six hundreth and first year, in the first month, the first day of the month, the waters were dried up from off the earth. Gen. viii. 13.
 Arms and the man I sing, the first who bore His course to Latium from the Trojan shore. Æn.
 Earliest in time.
 The first covenant had also ordinances of divine service. Heb. ix. i.
 I find, quoth Mat, reproof is vain! Who first offend, will first complain. Prior.
 Highest in dignity.
 Three presidents, of whom Daniel was first. Dan.
 First with the dogs, and king among the squires. Spect.
 Great; excellent.
                      My first son, Where will you go? Take good Cominius With thee. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.

First (adverb)
First. adv.

 Before any thing else; earliest.
 He, not unmindful of his usual art, First in dissembled fire attempts to part; Then roaring beasts and running streams he tries. Dryden.
 Thy praise, and thine was then the publick voice, First recommended Guiscard to my choice. Dryden.
 Heav'n, sure, has kept this spot of earth uncurst, To shew how all things were created first. Prior.
 Before any other consideration.
First, metals are more durable than plants; secondly, they are more solid and hard; thirdly, they are wholly subterraneous; whereas plants are part above earth, and part under the earth. Bacon's Natural History, №. 603.
 It has often at before it, and means at the beginning.
 At first the silent venom slid with ease, And seiz'd her cooler senses by degrees. Dryden's Æn.
 Excepting fish and insects, there are very few or no creatures that can provide for themselves at first, without the assistance of parents. Bentley's Sermons.
 First or last. At one hour or another.
 But sure a general doom on man is past, And all are fools and lovers first or last. Dryden.

First-begot
First-begot.First-begotten.

 n.s. [from first and begot.] The eldest of children.


His first-begot, we know; and sore have felt When his fierce thunder drove us to the deep. Parad. Reg.

First-begotten
First-begot.First-begotten.

 n.s. [from first and begot.] The eldest of children.


His first-begot, we know; and sore have felt When his fierce thunder drove us to the deep. Parad. Reg.

First-born
First-born. n.s. [first and born.] Eldest; the first by the order of nativity.
Last, with one midnight stroke, all the first-born Of Egypt must lie dead. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xii.
Hail, holy light, offspring of heav'n first-born! Milton.
The first-born has not a sole or peculiar right, by any law of God and nature; the younger children having an equal title with him. Locke.

First-fruits
First-fruits. n.s. [first and fruits.]

 What the season first produces or matures of any kind.
 A sweaty reaper from his tillage brought First-fruits, the green ear, and the yellow sheaf. Milt. P. L.
 The blooming hopes of my then very young patron have been confirmed by most noble first-fruits, and his life is going on towards a plentiful harvest of all accumulated virtues. Prior.
 The first profits of any thing.
 Although the king loved to employ and advance bishops, because, having rich bishopricks, they carried their reward upon themselves; yet he did use to raise them by steps, that he might not lose the profit of the first-fruits, which by that course of gradation was multiplied. Bacon's Henry VII.
 The earliest effect of any thing.
 See, Father, what first-fruits on earth are sprung, From thy implanted grace in man! Milton's Parad. Lost.

Firstling (adjective)
Fi'rstling. adj. [from first.] That which is first produced or brought forth.
All the firstling males that come of thy herd, and of thy flock, thou shalt sanctify unto the Lord thy God.  Deutr. xv.

Firstling (noun)
Fi'rstling. n.s. [from first.]

 The first produce or offspring.
                     A shepherd next, More meek, came with the firstlings of his flock, Choicest and best.  Milton's Paradise Lost, b.. xi.
 The tender firstlings of my woolly breed,  Shall on his holy altar often bleed. Dryden's Virg. Past.
 The firstlings of the flock are doom'd to die;  Rich fragrant wines the cheering bowl supply. Poe's Odyss.
 The thing first thought or done.
                         Our play Leaps o'er the vaunt and firstlings of these broils, 'Ginning i' th' middle. Shakes. Troil. and Cress. Prologue.
 The flighty purpose works o'erlook, Unless the deed go with it: from this moment, The very firstlings of my heart shall be The firstlings of my hand. Shakespeare's Macbeth.

Fiscal
Fi'scal. n.s. [from fiscus, a treasury, Latin] Exchequer; revenue.
 War, as it is entertained by diet, so can it not be long maintained by the ordinary fiscal and receipt. Bacon.

Fish (noun)
Fish. n.s. [ꝼıꞅc, Saxon; visch, Dutch.] An animal that inhabits the water.
The beasts, the fishes, and the winged fowls, Are their males subjects. Shakes. Comedy of Errours.
I fight when I cannot chuse, and I eat no fish. Sh. K. Lear.
And now the fish ignoble fates escape, Since Venus ow'd her safety to their shape. Creech.
There are fishes, that have wings, that are not strangers to the airy region; and there are some birds that are inhabitants of the water, whose blood is cold as fishes; and their flesh is so like in taste, that the scrupulous are allowed them on fish-days. Locke.

Fish (verb active)
To Fish. v.a. To search water in quest of fish, or any thing else.
Some have fished the very jakes for papers left there by men of wit. Swift.
Oft, as he fish'd her nether realms for wit, The goddess favour'd him, and favours yet. Pope's Dunciad.

Fish (verb neuter)
To Fish. v.n.

 To be employed in catching fishes.

 To endeavour at any thing by artifice.
 While others fish, with craft, for great opinion, I, with great truth, catch meer simplicity. Shakespeare.

Fish-hook
Fish-hook. n.s. [fish and hook.] A hook baited, with which fish are caught.
A sharp point, bended upward and backward, like a fish-hook. Grew's Musæum.

Fish-pond
Fish-pond. n.s. [fish and pond.] A small pool for fish.
Fish-ponds are no small improvement of watry boggy lands. Mortimer's Husbandry.
Fish-ponds were made where former forests grew, And hills were levell'd to extend the view. Prior.
After what I have said of the great value the Romans put upon fishes, it will not appear incredible that C. Hirrius should sell his fish-ponds for quadragies H.S. 32,291 l. 13 s. 4 d. Arbuthnot on Coins.

Fisher
Fi'sher. n s. [from fish.] One who is employed in catching fish.
In our fight the three were taken up By fishermen of Corinth, as we thought: At length another had seiz'd on us, And would have rest the fishers of their prey, Had not they been very slow of sail. Shakes. Comedy of Err.
We know that town is but with fishers fraught, Where Theseus govern'd and where Plato taught. Sandys.
 Lest he should suspect it, draw it from him, As fishers do the bait, to make him follow it. Denham.
A soldier now he with his coat appears; A fisher now, his trembling angle bears; Each shape he varies. Pope.

Fisherboat
Fi'sherboat.. n.s. [fisher and boat.] A boat employed in catching fish.

Fisherman
Fi'sherman. n.s. [fisher and man.] One whose employment and livelihood is to catch fish.
                         How fearful And dizzy 'tis to cast one's eyes so low! The fishermen that walk upon the beach Appear like mice. Shakespeare's King Lear.
At length two monsters of unequal size, Hard by the shore, a fisherman espies. Waller.
 Do scales and fins bear price to this excess? You might have bought the fisherman for less. Dryd. Juven.

Fishers-coat
Fishers-coat. n.s. [fisher and coat.] A coat worn by a fisher.
When Simon-Peter heard that it was the Lord, he girt his fishers-coat unto him, for he was naked, and did cast himself into the sea. Jo. xxi. 7.

Fishertown
Fi'shertown. n.s. [fisher and town.] A town inhabited by fishermen.
Others of them, in that time, burned that fishertown Mousehole. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.
Lime in Dorsetshire, a little fishertown. Clarendon, b. vii.

Fishery


Fishful


Fishify
To Fi'shify. v.a. [from fish.] To turn to fish: a cant word.
                 Here comes Romeo.
— Without his roe, like a dried herring: O flesh, flesh, how art thou fishified! Shak. Rom. and Juliet.

Fishing


Fishkettle
Fi'shkettle. n.s. [fish and kettle.] A caldron made long for the fish to be boiled without bending.
It is probably that the way of embalming amongst the Egyptians was by boiling the body, in a long caldron like a fishkettle, in some kind of liquid balsam. Grew’s Musæum.

Fistula
Fístula. n.s. [Latin; fistule, French.]

 A sinuous ulcer callous within; any sinuous ulcer.
That fistula which is recent is the easiest of cure: those of a long continuance are accompanied with ulcerations of the gland and caries in the bone. Wiseman's Surgery.
 Fistula Lachrimalis.  A disorder of the canals leading from the eye to the nose, which obstructs the natural progress of the tears, and makes them trickle down the cheek; but this is only the first and mildest stage of the disease: in the next there is matter discharged with the tears from the pinicta lachrimalia, and sometimes from an orifice broke through the skin between the nose and angle of the eye.  The last and worst degree of it is when the matter of the eye, by its long continuance, has not only corroded the neighbouring soft parts, but also affected the subjacent bone. Sharp's Surgery.

Fistular
Fístular. adj. [from fistula.] Hollow like a pipe.

Fistulous
Fístulous. adj. [from fistula; fistuleux, French.] Having the nature of a fistula; callous or sinuous like a fistula.
How these sinuous ulcers become fistulous, I have shewn you. Wiseman's Surgery.

Fitz
Fitz. n.s. [Norman, from fils, a son, Fr.] A son.  Only used in law and genealogy: as Fitzherbert, the son of Herbert; Fitzthomas, the son of Thomas; Fitzroy, the son of the king.  It is commonly used of illegitimate children.

Fleam
Fleam. n.s. [corrupted from φλεβότομον, the instrument used in phlebotomy.] An instrument used to bleed cattle, which is placed on the vein, and then driven by a blow.

Flexanimous
Flexánimous. adj. [flexanimus, Latin.] Having power to change the disposition of the mind. Dict.

Flog
To Flog. v.a. [from flagrum, Latin.] To lash; to whip; to chastise.
 The schoolmaster's joy is to flog. Swift.

Flook
Flook. n.s. [pflug, a plow, German.] The broad part of the anchor which takes hold of the ground.

Florin
Flórin. n.s. [French.] A coin first made by the Florentines. That of Germany is in value 2 s. 4 d. that of Spain 4 s. 4 d. halfpenny; that of Palermo and Sicily 2 s. 6 d. that of Holland 2 s.
 In the Imperial chamber the proctors have half a florin taxed and allowed them for every substantial recess. Ayliffe.

Flounce (verb neuter)
To Flounce. v.n. [plonsen, Dutch, to plunge.]

 To move with violence in the water or mire; to struggle or dash in the water.
 With his broad fins and forky tail he laves The rising surge, and flounces in the waves. Addison's Ovid.
 To move with weight and tumult.
             Six flouncing Flanders mares Are e'en as good as any two of theirs. Prior.
 To move with passionate agitation.
         When I'm duller than a post, Nor can the plainest word pronounce, You neither fume, nor fret, nor flounce. Swift.

Fly (noun)
Fly. n.s. [fleoʒe, Saxon.]

 A small winged insect of many species.
As flies to wanton boys, are we to th' gods;They kill us for their sport. Shakespeare's King Lear.
My country neighbours begin to think of being in general, before they come to think of the fly in their sheep, or the tares in their corn. Locke.
To prevent the fly, some propose to sow ashes with the seed. Mortimer's Husbandry.
        To heedless flies the window provesA constant death. Thomson's Summer.
 That part of a machine which, being put into a quick motion, regulates and equalises the motion of the rest.
If we suppose a man tied in the place of the weight, it were easy, by a single hair fastened unto the fly or balance of the jack, to draw him up from the ground. Wilkins.
 Fly, in a compass. That part which points how the wind blows.

Foetus
Fóetus. n.s. [Latin.] The child in the womb after it is perfectly formed: but before, it is called embryo. Quincy.
A fœtus, in the mother's womb, differs not much from the state of a vegetable. Locke.

Foh
Foh. interject. [from fah, Saxon, an enemy.] An interjection of abhorrence: as if one should at sight of any thing hated cry out a foe!
Not to affect many proposed matchesOf her own clime, complection and degree,Whereto we see in all things nature tends,Foh! one may smell in such a will most rank,Foul disproportions, thoughts unnatural. Shakes. Othello.

Foible
Fóible. n.s. [French.] A weak side; a blind side; a failing.
He knew the foibles of human nature. Freind's Hist. of Phys.
The witty men sometimes have sense enough to know their own foible, and therefore they craftily shun the attacks of argument. Watt's Logick.

Fool (noun)
Fool. n.s. [fsol, Welsh; fol, Islandick; fol, French.]

 One whom nature has denied reason; a natural; an idiot.
        Do'st thou call me fool, boy?— All thy other titles thou hast given away that thou wast born with. Shakespeare's King Lear.
The fool multitude, that chuse by show,Not learning more than the fond eye doth teach,Which pry not to the interior. Shak. Merchant of Venice.
It may be asked, whether the eldest son, being a fool, shall inherit paternal power before the younger, a wise man. Locke.
He thanks his stars he was not born a fool. Pope.
 [In Scripture.] A wicked man.
The fool hath said in his heart there is no God. Ps. xiv. 1.
 A term of indignity and reproach.
To be thought knowing, you must first put the fool upon all mankind. Dryden's Juvenal, Preface.
 One who counterfeits folly; a buffoon; a jester.
Where's my knave, my fool? Go you, and call my fool hither. Shakespeare's King Lear.
I scorn, although their drudge, to be their fool or jester. Milt.
If this disguise fit not naturally on so  grave a person, yet it may become him better than that fool's coat. Denham.
 To play the Fool. To play pranks like a hired jester; to jest; to make sport.
I returning where I left his armour, found another instead thereof, and armed myself therein to play the fool. Sidney
 To play the Fool. To act like one void of common understanding.
Well, thus we play the fools with the time,And the spirits of the wise fit in the cloudsAnd mock us. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
Is it worth the name of freedom to be at liberty to play the fool, and draw shame and misery upon a man's self? Locke.
 To make a Fool. To disappoint; to defeat.
'Twere as good a deed as to drink when a man's a-hungry, to challenge him to the field, and then to break promise with him, and make a fool of him. Shakes. Twelfth Night.

Fop
Fop. n.s. [A word probably made by chance, and therefore without etymology.]  A simpleton; a coxcomb; a man of small understanding and much ostentation; a pretender; a man fond of show, dress, and flutter; an impertinet.
            A whole tribe of fops,Got 'tween asleep and wake. Shakespeare's King Lear.
When such a positive abandon'd fop,Among his numerous absurdities,Stumbles upon some tolerable line,I fret to see them in such company. Roscommon.
The leopard's beauty, without the fox's wit, is no better than a fop in a gay coat. L'Estrange.
In a dull stream, which moving slow,You hardly see the current flow;When a small breeze obstructs the course,It whirls about for want of force,And in its narrow circle gathersNothing but chaff, and straws, and feathers:The current of a female mindStops thus, and turns with ev'ry wind;Thus whirling round, together drawsFools, fops, and rakes, for chaff and straws. Swift.

Fopdoodle
Fópdoodle. n.s. [fop and doodle.] A fool; an insignificant wretch.
Where sturdy butchers broke your noodle,And handled you like a fopdoodle. Hudibras, p. ii.

Forceps
Fórceps. n.s. [Latin.]
Forceps properly signifies a pair of tongs; but is used for an instrument in chirurgery, to extract any thing out of wounds, and the like occasions. Quincy.

Forcipated
Fórcipated. adj. [from forceps.] Formed like a pair of pincers to open and inclose.
The locusts have antennæ, or long horns before, with a long falcation or forcipated tail behind. Brown's Vulgar Err.
When they have seized their prey, they will so tenaciously hold it with their forcipated mouth, that they will not part therewith, even when taken out of the waters. Derham.

Fosterson
Fo'sterson. n.s. [foster and son.] One fed and educated, though not the son by nature.
Mature in years, to ready honours move;O of celestial seed! O fosterson of Jove! Dryd. Virg. Past.

Fougade
Fouga'de. n.s. [French.] In the art of war, a sort of little mine in the manner of a well, scarce more than ten feet wide and twelve deep, dug under some work or fortification, and charged with barrels or sacks of gunpowder to blow it up, and covered over with earth. Dict.

Fought
Fought. The preterite and participle of fight.

Foughten
Fo'ughten. [The passive participle of fight. Rarely used.] Contested; disputed by arms.
                     On the foughten fieldMichael and his angels, prevalentEncamping, plac'd in guard their watches roundCherubick waving fires. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vi.

Foul (adjective)


Foul (verb)


Foulfaced


Foully


Foulmouthed
Foulmou'thed. adj. [foul and mouth.] Scurrilous; habituated to the use of opprobrious terms and epithets.
My lord, he speaks most vilely of you, like a foulmouth'd man as he is, and said he would cudgel you. Shak. H. IV.
It was allowed by every body, that so foulmouthed a witness never appeared in any cause. Addison.
My reputation is too well established in the world to receive any hurt from such a foulmouthed scoundrel as he. Arbuth.
Now singing shrill, and scolding oft between,Scolds answer foulmouth'd scolds; bad neighborhood I ween. Swift.

Foulness
Fo'ulness.. n.s. [from foul.]

 The quality of being foul; filthiness; nastiness.
 The ancients were wont to make garments that were not destroyed but purified by fire; and whereas the spots or foulness of other cloaths are washed out, in these they were usually burnt away. Wilkins's Math. Magic.
 Pollution; impurity.
 It is no vicious blot, murder, or foulness,No unchaste action, or dishonour'd step,That hath depriv'd me of your grace and favour. Shakesp.
 There is not so chaste a nation as this, nor so free from all pollution or foulness: it is the virgin of the world. Bacon.
 Hatefulness; atrociousness.
 He by an affection sprung up from excessive beauty, should not delight in horrible foulness. Sidney.
                  Consul, you are too mild:The foulness of some facts takes thence all mercy:Report it to the senate. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
 It is the wickedness of a whole life, discharging all its filth and foulness into this one quality, as into a great sink or common shore. South's Sermons.
 Ugliness; deformity.
 He's fallen in love with your foulness, and she'll fall in love with my anger. Shakespeare's As you like it.
                  The fury laid asideHer looks and limbs, and with new methods triedThe foulness of th' infernal form to hide. Dryden's Æn.
 Dishonesty; want of candour.
 Piety is opposed to hypocrisy and insincerity, and all falseness or foulness of intentions; especially to that personated devotion, under which any kind of impiety is wont to be disguised. Hammond's Fundamentals.

Freak (noun)
Freak. n.s. [frech, German, saucy, petulant; fræc, Saxon, fugitive.]

 A sudden and causeless change of place.

 A sudden fancy; a humour; a whim; a capricious prank.
O! but I fear the fickle freaks, quoth she,Of fortune, and the odds of arms in field. Fairy Queen.
When that freak has taken possession of a fantastical head, the distemper is incurable. L'Estrange, Fable 100
She is so restless and peevish that she quarrels with all about her, and sometimes in a freak will instantly change her habitation. Spectator, № 427.
To vex me more, he took a freakTo slit my tongue, and make me speak. Swift.

Freak (verb)
To Freak. v.a. [A word, I suppose, Scotch, brought into England by Thomson.] To variegate; to checquer.
            There furry nations harbour:Sables of glossy black, and dark embrown'd,Or beauteous, freak'd with many a mingled hue. Thomson.

Freakish
Fréakish. adj. [from freak.] Capricious; humoursome.
It may be a question, whether the wife or the woman was the more freakish of the two; for she was still the same uneasy fop. L'Estrange, Fable 173.

Freakishly
Fréakishly. adv. [from freakish.] Capriciously; humoursomely.

Freakishness
Fréakishness. n.s. [from freakish.] Capriciousness; humoursomeness; whimsicalness.

Fream
To Fream. v.n. [fremere, Lat. fremir, French.] To growl or grunt as a boar. Bailey.

Freeze (verb active)
To Freeze. v.a. pret. froze; part. frozen or froze.

 To congeal with cold.

 To kill by cold.
         When we both lay in the field, Frozen almost to death, how did he lap me, Ev'n in his garments! Shakespeare's Richard III.
 My master and mistress are almost frozen to death. Shakesp.
 To chill by the loss of power or motion.
 I have a faint cold fear thrills through my veins, That almost freezes up the heat of life. Sh. Rom. and Juliet.
             Death came on amain, And exercis'd below his iron reign; Then upward to the seat of life he goes; Sense fled before him, what he touch'd he froze. Dryden.

Freeze (verb neuter)
To Freeze. v.n. preter. froze. [vriesen, Dutch.]

 To be congealed with cold.
 The aqueous humour of the eye will not freeze, which is very admirable, seeing it hath the perspicuity and fluidity of common water. Ray on the Creation.
 The freezing of water, or the blowing of a plant, returning at equidistant periods in all parts of the earth, would as well serve men to reckon their years by as the motions of the sun. Locke.
 To be of that degree of cold by which water is congealed.
 Orpheus with his lute made trees And mountain tops, that freeze, Bow themselves when he did sing. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
 Thou art all ice, thy kindness freezes. Shakes. Rich. III.
 Heav'n froze above severe, the clouds congeal, And thro' the crystal vault appear'd the standing hail. Dryd.

Friday
Fríday. n.s. [friʒe dæʒ, Saxon.] The sixth day of the week, so named of Freya, a Saxon deity.
An' she were not kin to me, she would be as fair as Friday as Helen is on Sunday. Shakespeare's Troilus and Cressida.
For Venus, like her day, will change her cheer,And seldom shall we see a Friday clear. Dryden.

Friend (noun)
Friend. n.s. [vriend, Dutch; freond, Saxon.] This word, with its derivatives, is pronounced frend, frendly: the i totally neglected.

 One joined to another in mutual benevolence and intimacy: opposed to foe or enemy.
        Friends of my soul, you twainRule in this realm, and the gor'd state sustain. Shakesp.
Some man is a friend for his own occasion, and will not abide in the day of thy trouble. Ecclus. vi. 8.
God's benison go with you, and with thoseThat would make good of bad, and friends of foes. Shakes.
    Wonder not to see this soul extendThe bounds, and seek some other self, a friend. Dryden.
 One without hostile intentions.
Who comes so fast in silence of the night?— A friend.— What friend? your name? Shakep. Merchant of Venice.
 One reconciled to another: this is put by the custom of the language somewhat irregularly in the plural number.
        He's friends with Cæsar,In state of health thou say'st, and thou say'st free. Shakesp.
My son came then into my mind; and yet my mindWas then scarce friends with him. Shak. King Lear.
 An attendant, or companion.
The king ordains their entrance, and ascendsHis regal seat, surrounded by his friends. Dryden's Æn.
 Favourer; one propitious.
Aurora riding upon Pegasus, sheweth her swiftness, and how she is a friend to poetry and all ingenious inventions. Peacham.
 A familiar compellation.
Friend, how camest thou in hither? Mat. xxii. 12.
        What supports me, do'st thou ask?The conscience, friend, t'have lost mine eyes o'erply'dIn liberty's defence. Milton.

Friend (verb)
To Friend. v.a. [from the noun.] To favour; to befriend; to countenance; to support.
I know that we shall have him well to friend. Shakesp.
When vice makes mercy, mercy's so extended,That, for the fault's love, is th' offender friended. Shakesp.

Frigid
Frígid. adj. [frigidus, Latin.]

 Cold; without warmth. In this sense it is seldom used but in science.
 In the torrid zone the heat would have been intolerable, and in the frigid zones the cold would have destroyed both animals and vegetables. Cheyne's Phil. Princ.
 Without warmth of affection.

 Impotent; without warmth of body.

 Dull; without fire of fancy.
 If justice Phillip's costive head Some frigid rhymes disburses, They shall like Persian tales be read, And glad both babes and nurses. Swift.

Frigorifick
Frigorífick. adj. [frigorificus, frigus and facio, Latin.] Causing cold.  A word used in science.
Frigorifick atoms or particles mean those nitrous salts which float in the air in cold weather, and occasion freezing. Quincy.

Frippery
Fríppery. n.s. [fripperie, French; fripperia, Italian.]

 The place where old cloaths are sold.
 Oh, oh, monster, we know what belongs to a frippery. Shakespeare's Tempest.
 Lurana is a frippery of bankrupts, who fly thither from Druina to play their after-game. Howel's Vocal Forrest.
 Old cloaths; cast dresses; tattered rags.
 Poor poet ape, that would be thought our chief, Whose works are e'en the frippery of wit; From brocage is become so bold a thief, As we, the robb'd, leave rage, and pity it. Ben. Johnson.
 The fighting-place now seamens rage supply, And all the tackling is a frippery. Donne.
 Ragfair is a place near the Tower of London, where old cloaths and frippery are sold. Notes to Pope's Dunciad.

Frog
Frog. n.s.  [ꝼꞃoᵹᵹa, Saxon.]

 A small animal with four feet, living both by land and water, and placed by naturalists among mixed animals, as partaking of beast and fish.  There is likewise a small green frog that porches on trees, said to be venomous.
Poor Tom, that eats the swimming frog, the toad, the todpole. Shakespeare’s King Lear.
 Auster is drawn with a pot or urn, pouring forth water, with which shall descend frogs. Peacham on Drawing.
  The hollow part of the horse’s hoof.

From Above
From above.

 From an higher place.
The Trojans from above their foes beheld;And with arm'd legions all the rampires fill'd. Dryd. Æneid.
 From heaven.
Every good gift, and every perfect gift is from above, and cometh down from the father of lights, with whom is no variableness, neither shadow of turning. James, i. 17.

Frump
To Frump. v.a. To mock; to browbeat. Skinner. Ainsw.

Fub
Fub. n.s. A plump chubby boy. Ainsworth.

Fucated
Fúcated. adj. [fucatus, Latin.]

 Painted; disguised with paint.

 Disguised by false snow.

Fucus
Fúcus. n.s. [Latin.] Paint for the face.
                 Women chat Of fucus this, and fucus that. Ben. Johnson.
 Those who paint for debauchery should have the fucus pulled off, and the coarseness underneath discovered. Collier.

Fuddle (verb active)
To Fúddle. v.a. [Of unknown etymology.] To make drunk.
                 Earnest brimming bowls Leave every soul the table floating round, And pavement faithless to the fuddled feet. Thoms. Autumn.

Fuddle (verb neuter)
To Fúddle. v.n. To drink to excess.
 Men, we see, will be whoring and fuddling on still. L'Estr.

Fugh
Fugh. interj. [perhaps from φεῦ.] An expression of abhorrence.
 A very filthy fellow: how odiously he smells of his country garlick! fugh how he stinks of Spain! Dryd. Don Sebastian.

Fulgid
Fúlgid. adj. [fulgidus, Latin.] Shining; dazzling glitter. Dict.

Full (adjective)
Full. adj. [ꝼull, Saxon; vol, Dutch.]

 Replete; without vacuity; without any space void.
Better is an handful with quietness than both the hands full with travel and vexation of spirit. Eccl. iv. 6.
 Abounding in any quality good or bad.
      With pretence from Strephon her to guard,He met her full, but full of warefulness. Sidney.
                You should tread a coursePretty and full of view. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
Followers, who make themselves as trumpets of the commendation of those they follow, are full of inconvenience; for they taint business through want of secresy, and they export honour from a man, and make him a return in envy. Bacon, Essay 49.
In that sweet season, as in bed I lay,I turn'd my weary side, but sill in vain,Though full of youthful health and void of pain. Dryden.
He is full of wants which he cannot supply, and compassed about with infirmities which he cannot remove. Tillots. Serm.
From yon bright heaven our author fetch'd his fire,And paints the passions that your eyes inspire;Full of that flame, his tender scenes he warms,And frames his goddess by your matchless charms. Granv.
 Stored with any thing; well supplied with any thing.
          Full of days was he;Two ages past, he liv'd the third to see. Tickell.
 Plump; saginated; fat.
A gentleman of a full body having broken his skin by a fall, the wound inflamed. Wiseman's Surgery.
 Saturated; sated.
I am full of the burnt offerings of rams. Isa. i. 11.
The alteration of scenes feeds and relieves of the eye, before it be full of the same object. Bacon.
 Crouded in the imagination or memory.
Every one is full of the miracles done by cold baths on decayed and weak constitutions. Locke.
 That which fills or makes full; large; great in effect.
Water digesteth a full meal sooner than any other liquor. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Complete; such as that nothing further is desired or wanted.
That day had been the full accomplishmentOf all his travels. Daniel's Civil War.
Being tried at that time only with a promise, he gave full credit to that promise, and still gave evidence of his fedelity as fast as occasions were offered. Hammond's Pract. Catechism.
The ressurection of Jesus from the dead hath given the world full assurance of another life. Tillotson, Sermon 5.
 Complete without abatement; at the utmost degree.
At the end of two full years Pharaoh dreamed. Genesis.
After hard riding plunge the horses into water, and allow them to drink as they please; but gallop them full speed, to warm the water in their bellies. Swift's Direct. to the Groom.
 Containing the whole matter; expressing much.
Where my expressions are not so full as his, either our language or my art were defective; but where mine are fuller than his, they are but the impressions which the often reading of him hath left upon my thoughts. Denham.
Should a man go about with never so set study to describe such a natural form of the year before the deluge as that which is at present established, he could scarcely do it in so few words, so fit and proper, so full and express. Woodward.
 Strong; not faint; not attenuated.
I did never know so full a voice issue from so empty a heart; but the saying is true, the empty vessel makes the greatest sound. Shakespeare's Henry V.
Barrels placed under the floor of a chamber, make all noises in the same more full and resounding. Bacon's Nat. History.
            Dryden taught to joinThe varying verse, the full resounding line. Pope.
 Mature; perfect.
In the sultanry of the Mamalukes, slaves reigned over families of free men; and much like were the case, if you suppose a nation, where the custom were that after full age the sons should expulse their fathers and mothers out of their possessions. Bacon's Holy War.
 [Applied to the moon.] Complete in its orb.
Towards the full moon, as he was coming home one morning, he felt his legs faulter. Wiseman's Surgery.
 Noting the conclusion of any matter, or a full stop.
Therewith he ended, making a full point of a hearty sigh. Sidney.
 Spread to view in all directions.
'Till about the end of the third century, I do not remember to have seen the head of a Roman emperor drawn with a full face: they always appear in profile. Addison on Medals.

Fur (noun)
Fur. n.s. [fourrure, French.]

 Skin with soft hair with which garments are lined for warmth, or covered for ornament.
December must be expressed with a horrid and fearful countenance; as also at his back a bundle of holly, holding in fur mittens the sign of Capricorn. Peacham on Drawing.
'Tis but dressing up a bird of prey in his cap and furs to make a judge of him. L'Estrange.
And lordly gout wrapt up in fur,And wheezing asthma, loth to stir. Swift.
 Soft hair of beasts found in cold countries, where nature provides coats suitable to the weather; hair in general.
This night, wherein the cubdrawn bear would couch,The lion and the belly-pinched wolfKeep their fur dry, unbonnetted he runs,And bids what will take all. Shakespeare's King Lear.
Such animals as feed upon flesh qualify it, the one by swallowing the hair or fur of the beasts they prey upon, the other by devouring some part of the feathers of the birds they gorge themselves with. Ray on the Creation.
 Any moisture exhaled to such a degree as that the remainder sticks on the part.
Methinks I am not right in ev'ry part;I feel a kind of trembling at my heart:My pulse unequal, and my breath is strong;Besides a filthy fur upon my tongue. Dryden's Pers. Sat. 3.

Fur (verb)
To Fur. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To line or cover with skins that have soft hair.
How mad a sight it was to see Dametas, like rich tissue furred with lambskins? Sidney, b. ii.
Through tatter'd cloaths small vices do appear;Robes and furr'd gowns hide all. Shakesp. King Lear.
You are for dreams and slumbers, brother priest;You fur your gloves with reasons. Shakes. Troil. and Cress.
 To cover with soft matter.
To make lampblack, take a torch and hold it under the bottom of a latten bason; and, as it groweth to be furred and black within, strike it with a feather into some shell. Peacham.
The sisters, mourning for their brother's loss,Their bodies hid in bark, and furr'd with moss. Dryden.
Their frying blood compels to irrigateTheir dry furr'd tongues. Phillips.
A dungeon wide and horrible; the wallsOn all sides furr'd with mouldy damps, and hungWith clots of ropy gore. Addison.

Furfur
Fúrfur. n.s. [Latin.] Husk or chaff, scurff or dandriff, that grows upon the skin, with some likeness to bran. Quincy.

Fuscation
Fuscátion. n.s. [fuscus, Latin.] The act of darkening or obscuring. Dict.

Fusee (1)
Fúsee. n.s. [fuseau, French.]

 The cone round which is wound the cord or chain of a clock or watch.
The reason of the motion of the balance is by the motion of the next wheel, and that by the motion of the next, and that by the motion of the fusee, and that by the motion of the spring :· the whole frame of the watch carries a reasonableness in it, the passive impression of the intellectual idea that was in the artist. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
 A firelock [from fusil, Fr.]; a small neat musquet. This is more properly written fusil.

Fusee (2)
Fusee of a bomb or granado shell, is that which makes the whole powder or composition in the shell take fire, to do the designed execution.  'Tis usually a wooden pipe or tap filled with wildfire, or some such matter; and is intended to burn no longer than is the time of the motion of the bomb from the mouth of the morter to the place where it is to fall, which time Anderson makes twenty-seven seconds. Harris.

Fusee (3)
Fúsee. Track of a buck. Ainsworth.

Fusil (adjective)
Fúsil. adj. [fusile, French; fusilis, Latin.]

 Capable of being melted; liquifiable by heat.
            The liquid ore he drain'dInto fit molds prepar'd; from which he form'dFirst his own tools: then, what might else be wroughtFusile, or grav'n in metal. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi.
Some, less skilful, fancy these scapi that occur in most of the larger Gothick buildings of England are artificial; and will have it, that they are a kind of fusil marble. Woodward.
 Running by the force of heat.
                Perpetual flames,O'er sand and ashes, and the stubborn flint,Prevailing, turn into a fusil sea. Phillips.

Fusil (noun)
Fúsil. n.s. [fusil, French.]

 A firelock; a small neat musquet.

 [In heraldry, from fusus, Latin.] Something like a spindle.
Fusils must be made long, and small in the middle, in the ancient coat of Mountague, argent three fusils in fesse gules. Peacham on Blazoning.
